Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Disparagement of Perishable Agricultural or Aquacultural Food Product

§ 69-1-251.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the production of agricultural and aquacultural food products constitutes an important and significant portion of the state economy and that it is beneficial to the citizens of this state to protect the vitality of the agricultural and aquacultural economy by providing a cause of action for producers of perishable agricultural food products to recover damages for the disparagement of any perishable agricultural or aquacultural food product.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 605, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 69-1-253.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 69-1-251 through 69-1-257, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Disparagement” means dissemination to the public in any manner of any false information that the disseminator knows to be false, and which states or implies that a perishable agricultural or aquacultural food product is not safe for consumption by the consuming public. Such information is presumed to be false when not based upon reasonable and reliable scientific inquiry, facts or data.

“Perishable agricultural or aquacultural food product” means any food product of agriculture or aquaculture which is sold or distributed in a form that will perish or decay beyond marketability within a period of time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 605, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 69-1-255.
Cause of action for damages and appropriate relief.

Any producer of perishable agricultural or aquacultural food products who suffers damage as a result of another person’s disparagement of any such perishable agricultural or aquacultural food product has a cause of action for damages and for any other appropriate relief in a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 605, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 69-1-257.
Limitations of action.

Any civil action for damages for disparagement of perishable agricultural or aquacultural food products shall be commenced within one (1) year after the cause of action accrues.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 605, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1994.